Hawaii statutes.
§453-5 Hawaii medical board; appointment,
removal, qualifications. (a) For the purpose of carrying out this
chapter, the governor shall appoint a Hawaii medical board whose duty it shall
be to examine all applicants for license to practice medicine or surgery. As
used in this chapter, "board" means the Hawaii medical board.

The board shall consist of eleven persons,
seven of whom shall be physicians or surgeons licensed under the laws of the
State, two of whom shall be osteopathic physicians licensed under the laws of
the State, and two of whom shall be lay members appointed from the public at
large. Of the nine members who are physicians, surgeons, or osteopathic
physicians, at least five shall be appointed from the city and county of
Honolulu and at least one shall be appointed from each of the other counties.
Medical societies in the various counties may conduct elections periodically
but no less frequently than every two years to determine nominees for the board
to be submitted to the governor. In making appointments, the governor may
consider recommendations submitted by the medical societies and the public at
large. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and qualified.

(b) The department shall employ, not subject
to chapter 76, an executive secretary to administer the board's activities and
an employee to administer the medical inquiry and conciliation panels
established under chapter 671. The employee responsible for administration of
the medical inquiry and conciliation panels shall have no duties in
administration of the board's activities. [L 1896, c 60, §4; RL 1925, §1025; RL
1935, §1204; RL 1945, §2504; am L 1953, c 86, §1; RL 1955, §64-4; am L Sp 1959
2d, c 1, §§5, 19; HRS §453-5; am L 1969, c 257, §4; am L 1976, c 219, §8; am L
1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 92, pt of §1(2); am L 1984, c 168, §10; am L
1985, c 106, §1; am L 1992, c 202, §98; am L 1999, c 248, §3; am L 2000, c 253,
§150; am L 2008, c 9, §2; am L 2012, c 296, §2]

Attorney General Opinions

Subsection (a) is constitutional, with regard to the use of
the phrase "appointed and qualified" to describe when a successor's
appointment terminates a holdover member's position. Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Law Journals and Reviews

Medical Malpractice in Hawai‘i: Tort Crisis or Crisis of
Medical Errors? 30 UH L. Rev. 167 (2007).

Case Notes

De facto officers' actions are not subject to collateral
attack. 15 H. 273 (1903).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next